California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
Section 1372 of the Internal Revenue Code shall be modified so that references to partnership treatment shall be to Internal Revenue Code partnership provisions, as modified by Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001).

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1139, Sec. 55.   Effective September 25, 1987.   Applicable to income years beginning on or after January 1, 1987, by Sec. 241 of Ch. 1139.)
-------------------------------------------

23808.

Sections 1373 and 1379 of the Internal Revenue Code shall not be applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 11, Sec. 64.   Effective February 19, 1988.   Applicable to income years beginning on or after January 1, 1988, by Sec. 93 of Ch. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

23809.

There is hereby imposed a tax on built-in gains attributable to California sources, determined in accordance with the provisions of Section 1374 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to tax imposed on certain built-in gains, as modified by this section.

(a) (1) The rate of tax specified in Section 1374(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be equal to the rate of tax imposed under Section 23151 in lieu of the rate of tax specified in Section 11(b) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) In the case of an “S” corporation that is also a financial corporation, the rate of tax specified in
 paragraph (1) shall be increased by the excess of the rate imposed under Section 23183 over the rate imposed under Section 23151.

(b) The provisions of Section 1374(b)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to credits, are modified to provide that the tax imposed under subdivision (a) may not be reduced by any credits allowed under this part.

(c) The provisions of Section 1374(b)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to coordination with Section 1201(a), do not apply to taxable years beginning before January 1, 2018, and ending before January 1, 2025.

(d) (1) For corporations described in paragraph (2), the provisions of Sections 1374(c)(1) and 1374(d)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code
 apply, based upon the effective date of the election to be treated as an “S” corporation for federal tax purposes, regardless of the date on which the corporation became an “S” corporation for state tax purposes.

(2) This subdivision applies to a corporation that, for its last taxable year beginning before January 1, 2002, was an “S” corporation for federal tax purposes and a “C” corporation for purposes of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), and this part, and, as a result of the enactment of Chapter 35 of the Statutes of 2002, is an “S” corporation for the corporation’s taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2002.

(e) Section 1374(d)(7)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to recognition period, is modified by
 substituting “10-year” in lieu of “5-year.” 

(f) The amendments to this section made by Section 1 of Chapter 782 of the Statutes of 2004 shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2002.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 87.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

23811.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, there is hereby imposed a tax on passive investment income attributable to California sources, determined in accordance with the provisions of Section 1375 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to tax imposed on passive investment income, as modified by this section.

(a) The tax imposed under this section may not be imposed on an “S corporation” that has no excess net passive income for federal income tax purposes determined in accordance with
 Section 1375 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(b) (1) The rate of tax shall be equal to the rate of tax imposed under Section 23151 in lieu of Section 11(b) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) In the case of an “S corporation” that is also a financial corporation, the rate of tax specified in paragraph (1) shall be increased by the excess of the rate imposed under Section 23183 over the rate imposed under Section 23151.

(c) Section 1375(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to credits, is modified to provide that the tax imposed under subdivision (a) may not be reduced by any credits allowed under this part.

(d) The term “subchapter C earnings and profits” or “accumulated earnings and profits” as used in Section 1375 of the
 Internal Revenue Code shall mean the “subchapter C earnings and profits” of the corporation attributable to California sources determined under this part, modified as provided in subdivision (e).

(e) (1) In the case of a corporation that is an “S corporation” for purposes of this part for its first taxable year for which it has in effect a valid federal S election, there shall be allowed as a deduction in determining that corporation’s “subchapter C earnings and profits” at the close of any taxable year the amount of any consent dividend (as provided in paragraph (2)) paid after the close of that taxable year.

(2) In the event there is a determination that a corporation described in paragraph (1) has “subchapter C earnings and profits” at the close of any taxable year, that corporation shall be entitled to distribute a consent dividend to its shareholders.
 The amount of the consent dividend may not exceed the difference between the corporation’s “subchapter C earnings and profits” determined under subdivision (d) at the close of the taxable year with respect to which the determination is made and the corporation’s “subchapter C earnings and profits” for federal income tax purposes at the same date. A consent dividend must be paid within 90 days of the date of the determination that the corporation has “subchapter C earnings and profits.” For this purpose, the date of a determination means the effective date of a closing agreement pursuant to Section 19441, the date an assessment of tax imposed by this section becomes final, or the date of execution by the corporation of an agreement with the Franchise Tax Board relating to liability for the tax imposed by this section. For purposes of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), and this part, a corporation must make the election provided in Section 1368(e)(3) of the
 Internal Revenue Code.

(3) If a corporation distributes a consent dividend, it shall claim the deduction provided in paragraph (1) by filing a claim therefor with the Franchise Tax Board within 120 days of the date of the determination specified in paragraph (2).

(4) The collection of tax imposed by this section from a corporation described in paragraph (2) shall be stayed for 120 days after the date of the determination specified in paragraph (2). If a claim is filed pursuant to paragraph (3), collection of that tax shall be further stayed until the date the claim is acted upon by the Franchise Tax Board.

(5) If a claim is filed pursuant to paragraph (3), the running of the statute of limitations on the making of assessments and actions for collection of the tax imposed by this section shall be suspended for a
 period of two years after the date of the determination specified in paragraph (2).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 268, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

23813.

Section 1377(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to determination defined, is modified to include, in addition to the items specified therein, the following:

(a) A decision by the State Board of Equalization that has become final.

(b) A closing agreement made under Article 6 (commencing with Section 19441) of Chapter 6 of Part 10.2.

(c) A final disposition by
 the Franchise Tax Board of a claim for refund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 611, Sec. 76.   Effective October 3, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Computation of Tax When Law Changed [24251. - 24251.]

24251.

The tax on any taxpayer for a period beginning in one calendar year (called “first calendar year”) and ending in the following calendar year (called “second calendar year”) where the law applicable to the computation of taxes for calendar year taxpayers for the second calendar year is different from the law applicable to computation of taxes for calendar year taxpayers for the first calendar year, shall, except as otherwise provided, be the sum of:

(a) The same proportion of a tax for the entire period, determined under the law and rates applicable to the first calendar year which the portion of the period
 falling within the first year is of the entire period; and

(b) The same proportion of a tax for the entire period, determined under the law and rates applicable to the second calendar year which the portion of the period falling within the second calendar year is of the entire period.

Any tax that has been paid under the law applicable to the first calendar year if in excess of the tax imposed by this section shall be refunded or credited to the taxpayer as provided in Chapter 22. Any tax in addition to that paid under the law applicable to the first calendar year made necessary by this article shall be immediately due and payable upon notice and demand from the Franchise Tax Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Gross Income [24271. - 24329.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [24271. - 24276.]

24271.

(a) Section 61 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to gross income defined, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) A distributive share of partnership gross income shall be determined in accordance with Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001).

(c) Income from an interest in an estate or trust shall be determined in accordance with Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 877, Sec. 41.   Effective October 6, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

24272.

For the purposes of the tax imposed under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 23101), “gross income” includes all interest received from federal, state, municipal or other bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 193, Sec. 126.)
-------------------------------------------

24272.2.

The provisions of Section 72(u) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the treatment of annuity contracts not held by natural persons, shall be applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1139, Sec. 58.   Effective September 25, 1987.   Applicable to income years beginning on or after January 1, 1987, by Sec. 241 of Ch. 1139.)
-------------------------------------------

24272.5.

(a) Section 7518 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to tax incentives relating to merchant marine capital construction funds, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Section 7518(d)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified as follows:

(1) By substituting “70 percent” in lieu of the reference to “the percentage applicable under Section 243(a)(1).”

(2) To refer to Section 24402 in lieu of Section 243 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(c) Section 7518(d)(2)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to refer to “interest income exempt from taxation” under this part in lieu of “interest income exempt from taxation under Section 103.”

(d) Section 7518(g)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified as follows:

(1) To refer to Article 6 (commencing with Section 19101) of Chapter 4 of Part 10.2 in lieu of Section 6601 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) To refer to Article 7 (commencing with Section 19131) of Chapter 4 of Part 10.2 in lieu of Section 6651 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(e) Section 7518(g)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified as follows:

(1) By substituting a reference to “this part” in lieu of “Chapter 1” in each place in which it appears.

(2) To refer to Section 23151 in lieu of Section 11 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(3) The last sentence in Section 7518(g)(6)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 611, Sec. 77.   Effective October 3, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

24273.

(a) Amounts received as loans from the Commodity Credit Corporation shall, at the election of the taxpayer, be considered as income and shall be included in gross income for the taxable year in which received.

(b) If a taxpayer exercises the election provided for in subsection (a) for any taxable year, then the method of computing income so adopted shall be adhered to with respect to all subsequent taxable years unless with the approval of the Franchise Tax Board a change
 to a different method is authorized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 113.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24273.5.

(a) Noncash patronage allocations from farmers’ cooperative and mutual associations (whether paid in capital stock, revolving fund certificates, retain certificates, certificates of indebtedness, letters of advice or in some other manner that discloses the dollar amount of such noncash patronage allocations) may, at the election of the taxpayer, be considered as income and included in gross income for the taxable year in which received.

(b) If a taxpayer exercises the
 election provided for in subdivision (a), the amount included in gross income shall be the face amount of such allocations.

(c) If a taxpayer elects to exclude noncash patronage allocations from gross income for the taxable year in which received, such allocations shall be included in gross income in the year that they are redeemed or realized upon.

(d) If a taxpayer exercises the election provided for in subdivision (c), the face amount of such noncash patronage allocations shall be disclosed in the return made for the taxable year in which such noncash patronage allocations were received.

(e) If a taxpayer exercises the election provided for in subdivision (a) or (c) for any taxable year, then the method of computing income so adopted shall be adhered to with respect to all subsequent taxable years unless with the
 approval of the Franchise Tax Board a change to a different method is authorized.

(f) If a taxpayer has made the election provided for in subdivision (c), then (1) the statutory period for the assessment of a deficiency for any taxable year in which the amount of any noncash patronage allocations are realized shall not expire prior to the expiration of four years from the date the Franchise Tax Board is notified by the taxpayer (in any manner as the Franchise Tax Board may by regulation prescribe) of the realization of gain on such allocations; and (2) that deficiency may be assessed prior to the expiration of the four-year period, notwithstanding the provisions of Section 19057 or the provisions of any other law or rule of law which would otherwise prevent such assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 114.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24275.

In the case of any taxpayer who is required to include the amount of any nuclear decommissioning costs in the taxpayer’s cost of service for ratemaking purposes, there shall be includable in the gross income of that taxpayer the amount so included for any taxable year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 115.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24276.

Section 90 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to illegal federal irrigation subsidies, shall apply to water delivered to the taxpayer on or after January 1, 1988, in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1989, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 116.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Exclusions [24301. - 24315.]

24301.

In computing the tax imposed under this part, “gross income” does not include any of the items specified in this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

24302.

Amounts received other than amounts paid by reason of the death of the insured under life insurance, endowment or annuity contracts, either during the term or at maturity or upon surrender of the contract, equal to the total amount of premiums paid thereon. In the case of a transfer for a valuable consideration by assignment or otherwise, of a life insurance, endowment or annuity contract or any interest therein, only the actual value of such consideration and the amount of the premiums and other sums subsequently paid by the transferee shall be excluded from gross income under Section 24305 or this section. The preceding sentence shall not apply in the case of such a
 transfer if such contract or interest therein has a basis for determining gain or loss in the hands of a transferee determined in whole or in part by reference to such basis of such contract or interest therein in the hands of the transferor or to a corporation in which the insured is a shareholder or officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1028.)
-------------------------------------------

24303.

Any grant made in any taxable year by the Secretary of the Treasury under Section 1603 of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Tax Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5) to a person that places in service specified energy property shall not be includable in the gross income or the alternative minimum taxable income of the taxpayer, but shall be taken into account in determining the basis of the property to which that grant relates, except that the basis of that property shall be reduced
 using rules prescribed under Section 50(c) of the Internal Revenue Code in the same manner as a credit allowed under Section 48(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, and adjusted in accordance with rules applied by the Secretary of the Treasury under Section 1603(f) of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Tax Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5).

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 64.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

24305.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), amounts received under life insurance policies and contracts paid by reason of the death of the insured but if such amounts are held by the insurer under an agreement to pay interest thereon, the interest payments shall be included in gross income.

(b) Proceeds of flexible premium
 contracts payable by reason of death shall be excluded from gross income only in accordance with the provisions of Section 101(f) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(c) (1) In the case of an employer-owned life insurance contract, any amount received by reason of death of an insured shall be excluded from gross income only in accordance with the provisions of Section 101(j) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) Section 101(j) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to treatment of certain employer-owned life insurance contracts, shall apply in accordance with the provisions of Section 863(d) of the Pension Protection Act of 2006 (Public Law 109-280), relating to effective dates, except that the phrase “January 1, 2010,” shall be substituted for “the date of the enactment of this Act” contained therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 65.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

24306.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings, as provided in the Golden State Scholarshare Trust Act (Article 19 (commencing with Section 69980) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of the Education Code):

(1) “Beneficiary” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 69980 of the Education Code.

(2) “Benefit” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 69980 of
 the Education Code.

(3) “Participant” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (h) of Section 69980 of the Education Code.

(4) “Participation agreement” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (i) of Section 69980 of the Education Code.

(5) “Scholarshare trust” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 69980 of the Education Code.

(b) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1998, and before January 1, 2002, except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), gross income of a participant shall not include any of the following:

(1) Any earnings under a Scholarshare trust, or a participation agreement, as provided in Article 19 (commencing with Section 69980) of
 Chapter 2 of Part 42 of the Education Code.

(2) Contributions to the Scholarshare trust on behalf of a beneficiary shall not be includable as gross income of that beneficiary.

(c) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1998, and before January 1, 2002:

(1) Any distribution under a Scholarshare trust participation agreement shall be includable in the gross income of the distributee in the manner as provided under Section 72 of the Internal Revenue Code, as modified by Section 24272.2, to the extent not excluded from gross income under any other provision of this part. For purposes of applying Section 72 of the Internal Revenue Code, the following apply:

(A) All Scholarshare trust accounts of which an individual is a beneficiary shall be
 treated as one account, except as otherwise provided.

(B) All distributions during a taxable year shall be treated as one distribution.

(C) The value of the participation agreement, income on the participation agreement, and investment in the participation agreement shall be computed as of the close of the calendar year in which the taxable year begins.

(2) A contribution by a for-profit or nonprofit entity, or by a state or local government agency, for the benefit of an owner or employee of that entity or a beneficiary whom the owner or employee has the power to designate, including the owner or employee’s minor children, shall be included in the gross income of that owner or employee in the year the contribution is made.

(3) For purposes of this
 subdivision, “distribution” includes any benefit furnished to a beneficiary under a participation agreement, as provided in Article 19 (commencing with Section 69980) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of the Education Code.

(4) (A) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to that portion of any distribution that, within 60 days of distribution, is transferred to the credit of another beneficiary under the Scholarshare trust who is a “member of the family,” as that term is used in Section 529(e)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended by Section 211 of the Taxpayer Relief Act of 1997 (Public Law 105-34), of the former beneficiary of that Scholarshare trust.

(B) Any change in the beneficiary of an interest in the Scholarshare trust shall not be treated as a distribution for purposes of paragraph (1) if the new beneficiary is a “member of the family,” as that term is used in
 Section 2032A(e)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, of the former beneficiary of that Scholarshare trust.

(d) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2002, Sections 529(c) and 529(e) of the Internal Revenue Code shall apply except as otherwise provided in Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) and this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 59.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

24307.

(a) Section 108 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to income from discharge of indebtedness, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Section 108(b)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to general business credit, is modified by substituting “this part” in lieu of “Section 38 (relating to general business credit).”

(c) Section 108(b)(2)(G) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to foreign tax credit carryovers, shall not apply.

(d) Section 108(b)(3)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to credit carryover reduction, is modified by substituting “11.1 cents” in lieu of “3313 cents” in each place in which it appears. In the case where more than one credit is allowable under this part, the credits shall be reduced on a pro rata basis.

(e) Section 108(g)(3)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to adjusted tax attributes, is modified by substituting “$9” in lieu of “$3.”

(f) (1) The amendments to Section 108 of the Internal Revenue Code made
 by Section 13150 of the Revenue Reconciliation Act of 1993 (Public Law 103-66), relating to exclusion from gross income for income from discharge of qualified real property business indebtedness, shall apply to discharges occurring on or after January 1, 1996, in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1996.

(2) If a taxpayer makes an election for federal income tax purposes under Section 108(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to treatment of discharge of qualified real property business indebtedness, a separate election shall not be allowed under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 23051.5 and the federal election shall be binding for purposes of this part.

(3) If a taxpayer has not made an election for federal income tax purposes under Section 108(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to treatment of discharge of qualified real property business
 indebtedness, then the taxpayer shall not be allowed to make that election for purposes of this part.

(g) The amendments to Section 108 of the Internal Revenue Code made by Section 13226 of the Revenue Reconciliation Act of 1993 (Public Law 103-66), relating to modifications of discharge of indebtedness provisions, shall apply to discharges occurring on or after January 1, 1996, in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1996.

(h) The amendments made to Section 108(d)(7)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain provisions to be applied at the corporate level by Section 402 of the Job Creation and Worker Assistance Act of 2002 (Public Law 107-147), shall apply to discharges of indebtedness after December 31, 2001, in taxable years ending after that date. This subdivision shall not apply to any discharge of indebtedness made before March 1, 2002, pursuant to a
 plan of reorganization filed with a bankruptcy court on or before October 11, 2001.

(i) Section 108(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to deferral and ratable inclusion of income arising from business indebtedness discharged by the reacquisition of a debt instrument, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 359, Sec. 30.   (AB 154)   Effective September 30, 2015.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2015, as provided in Sec. 41 of Stats. 2015, Ch. 359.)
-------------------------------------------

24308.

Section 1078 of Public Law 98-369 (Tax Reform Act of 1984), relating to exclusions from gross income of payments from the United States Forest Service as a result of restricting motorized traffic in the Boundary Waters Canoe Area, shall apply, with the following exceptions:

(a) Section 1078(f)(2) of that act shall not be applicable.

(b) This section shall be effective only for payments made in taxable years beginning on or after
 January 1, 1985.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 119.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24308.1.

Gross income does not include any amount received as a rebate, voucher, or other financial incentive issued by the California Energy Commission, the Public Utility Commission, or a local publicly owned electric utility, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 9604 of the Public Utilities Code, for any expenses paid or incurred by a taxpayer for the purchase or installation of any of the following devices:

(a) A thermal system as defined in Section 25600 of the Public Resources Code.

(b) A solar system as defined in Section 25600 of the Public Resources Code.

(c) A wind energy system device that produces electricity.

(d) A fuel cell generating system, as described in the California Energy Commission’s Emerging Renewable Resources Account Guidebook, that produces electricity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 843, Sec. 2.   Effective September 24, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

24308.2.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, gross income does not include any amount awarded as a restaurant revitalization grant pursuant to Section 9009c of Title 15 of the United States Code.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding Section 24425, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, paragraph (2) of Section 9673 of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (Public Law 117-2) shall apply, except as provided.

(2) Paragraph (2) of Section 9673 of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (Public Law 117-2) is modified by substituting the phrase “provided by paragraph (1)” with “provided by this section.”

(c) The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) shall not apply to any standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, guideline, or any other guidance established or issued by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(d) This section shall be operative for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 3, Sec. 17.   (SB 113)   Effective February 9, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

24308.3.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, gross income does not include any amount awarded as a shuttered venue operator grant pursuant to Section 9009a of Title 15 of the United States Code.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding Section 24425, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, subsection (d) of Section 278 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260) shall apply, except as provided.

(2) Subsection (d) of Section 278 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260) is modified by substituting the phrase “For purposes of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986” with “For
 purposes of this part”.

(3) Paragraphs (2) and (3) of subsection (d) of Section 278 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260) shall not apply to an ineligible entity.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Ineligible entity” means a taxpayer that either:

(A) Is a publicly-traded company.

(B) Does not meet the reduction from the gross receipts requirements of Section 636(a)(37)(A)(iv)(bb) of Title 15 of the United States Code, as added by Section 311 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260).

(2) “Publicly-traded company” means a publicly-traded entity
 as described in Section 342 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260).

(d) This section shall be operative for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 3, Sec. 18.   (SB 113)   Effective February 9, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

24308.4.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2026, gross income does not include a bill credit or credits received by a customer from a community water system or wastewater treatment provider pursuant to the Water and Wastewater System Payments Under the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (Chapter 4.7 (commencing with Section 116773) of Part 12 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code). 

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2026, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 3, Sec. 19.   (SB 113)   Effective February 9, 2022.   Repealed as of December 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

24308.5.

(a) Gross income does not include cost-share payments received by forest landowners from the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection pursuant to the California Forest Improvement Act of 1978 (Part 2.5 (commencing with Section 4790) of Division 1 of the Public Resources Code) or from the United States Department of Agriculture, Forest Service, under the Forest Stewardship Program and the Stewardship Incentives Program, pursuant to the Cooperative Forestry Assistance Act, as amended (Public Law 101-624).

(b) The amount of any cost-share payment excluded pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be considered with regard to either of the following:

(1) Determining the basis of property acquired or improved.

(2) Computing any allowable deduction to which the taxpayer may otherwise be entitled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 22, Sec. 3.   Effective March 25, 1994.   See same-numbered section added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

24308.5.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2026, gross income does not include a bill credit or credits received by a customer from a utility applicant pursuant to the California Arrearage Payment Program Under the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (Article 12 (commencing with Section 16429.5) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2026, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 3, Sec. 20.   (SB 113)   Effective February 9, 2022.   Repealed as of December 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   See same-numbered section added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

24308.6.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, gross income does not include any covered loan amount forgiven pursuant to Section 1106 of the Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act (Public Law 116-136), pursuant to the Paycheck Protection Program and Health Care Enhancement Act (Public Law 116-139), pursuant to the Paycheck Protection Program Flexibility Act of 2020 (Public Law 116-142), pursuant to the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260), or pursuant to the PPP Extension Act of 2021 (Public Law 117-6).

(b) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, gross income does not include any advance grant amount issued pursuant
 to Section 1110(e) of the Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act (Public Law 116-136), or pursuant to Section 331 of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260).

(c) (1) Notwithstanding Section 24425, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, subsection (a) of Section 276 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260) shall apply, except as provided.

(2) Paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Section 276 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260) is modified by substituting the phrase “For purposes of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986” with “For purposes of this
 part.”

(3) The provisions of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Section 276 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260), relating to paragraphs (2) and (3) of
 subsection (i) of Section 7A of the Small Business Act, shall not apply to an ineligible entity.

(4) Paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Section 276 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260) shall not apply.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding Section 24425, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, subsection (b) of Section 276 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260) shall apply, except as provided.

(2) Subsection (b) of Section 276 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260) is modified by substituting the phrase “For purposes of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, in
 the case of any taxable year ending after the date of the enactment of this Act” with “For purposes of this part.”

(3) Paragraphs (2) and (3) of subsection (b) of Section 276 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260) shall not apply to an ineligible entity.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding Section 24425, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, subsection (a) of Section 278 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260) shall apply, except as provided.

(2) Subsection (a) of Section 278 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260) is modified by substituting the phrase “For purposes of the
 Internal Revenue Code of 1986” with “For purposes of this part.”

(3) Paragraphs (2) and (3) of subsection (a) of Section 278 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260) shall not apply to an ineligible entity.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding Section 24425, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, subsection (b) of Section 278 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260) shall apply, except as provided.

(2) Subsection (b) of Section 278 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260) is modified by substituting the phrase “For purposes of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986” with “For purposes
 of this part.”

(g) Notwithstanding Section 17280, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, subsection (a) of Section 304 of Title III of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260) shall apply, except as provided. 

(h) For purposes of this section, all of the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Covered loan” has the same meaning as in Section 1106 of the Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act (Public Law 116-136), or pursuant to the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260).

(2) “Advance grant amount” means an emergency Economic Injury Disaster Loan grant pursuant to Section
 1110(e) of the Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act (Public Law 116-136), or a targeted Economic Injury Disaster Loan advance pursuant to Section 331 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260).

(3) “Ineligible entity” means a taxpayer that either:

(A) Is a publicly traded company.

(B) Does not meet the reduction from the gross receipts requirements of Section 636(a)(37)(A)(iv)(bb) of Title 15 of the United States Code, as added by Section 311 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260).

(4) “Publicly traded company” means a publicly traded entity as described in Section 342
 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260).

(i) The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) shall not apply to any standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, guideline, or any other guidance established or issued by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(j) The amendments made by the act adding this subdivision shall be operative for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019.

(k) The amendments made to this section by Chapter 55 of the Statutes of 2022 shall be operative for taxable years beginning on or after January 1,
 2019.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 88.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.   Operative in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, by Stats. 2022, Ch. 55.)
-------------------------------------------

24308.7.
